District of Columbia statutes.
47-1807.09

Job growth tax credit.

A job growth tax credit shall be allowed as provided in subchapter VII-A of this chapter [§ 47-1807.51 et seq.].

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-202, § 2(b), 57 DCR 4746
For temporary (90 day) repeal of § 4 of D.C. Law 18-202, see § 715 of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).

Sections 3 and 4 of D.C. Law 18-202 provided:

“Sec. 3. Sunset.

“This act shall expire on January 1, 2030.

“Sec. 4. Applicability.

“This act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”

Section 715 of D.C. Law 18-370 repealed section 3 of D.C. Law 18-202.